Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
CHAPTER 24 Circuit Courts Having Continuous Session [Repealed]

24.010.
Counties of less than 150,000 population constituting separate circuits — Continuous session — Where court held — Where cases tried. [Repealed.]

24.020.
Legal notices. [Repealed.]

24.030.
Rules. [Repealed.]

24.040.
Juries to be drawn and meet in two places — Number of grand juries. [Repealed.]

24.045.
Additional judge for Fayette County — Divisions of court — Sessions and business of court. [Repealed.]

24.046.
Judicial circuits having more than one judge. [Repealed.]

24.047.
Two judges in Warren County. [Repealed.]

24.048.
Six judges in Fayette County — Numbered divisions — Election of judges. [Repealed.]

24.049.
Two judges in Franklin County — Divisions. [Repealed].

24.050.
Two judges in Kenton County. [Repealed.]

24.051.
Rules and distribution of cases in court with four judges. [Repealed.]

24.052.
Warren County to have court of continuous session — Terms. [Repealed.]

24.055.
Additional judge for Campbell County; sessions and business of court. [Repealed.]

24.056.
Additional judge for Pike County; divisions of court; sessions and business of court. [Repealed.]

24.060.
Two divisions in court having two judges and continuous session. [Repealed.]

24.065.
Courts having more than one judge, in counties having less than 150,000 population — Jurisdiction — Divisions — Rules. [Repealed.]

24.068.
Criminal and civil branches of circuit courts in counties having a population of 150,000 or more, but less than 250,000 — Adoption of rules. [Repealed.]

24.070.
Election of judges for two divisions. [Repealed.]

24.075.
Election of judges by numbered divisions. [Repealed.]

24.080.
Which division to try actions. [Repealed.]

24.090.
Assignment of actions to divisions. [Repealed.]

24.100.
Either division may act provisionally until case assigned. [Repealed.]

24.110.
Division of pending cases when additional judge added. [Repealed.]

24.120.
Equalization of docket. [Repealed.]

24.130.
Transfer and consolidation of actions. [Repealed.]

24.140.
What judge to preside when court held in two places; assignment of cases. [Repealed.]

24.150.
Other judge may act when one disqualified; special judge. [Repealed.]

24.160.
Rules; general terms; order book. [Repealed.]

24.170.
Number of judges in Jefferson County. [Repealed.]

24.175.
Two additional judges for Jefferson County; divisions of court; election of judges; business of court. [Repealed.]

24.176.
Two further additional judges; divisions for Thirtieth Circuit Court District. [Repealed.]

24.177.
Two more judges; divisions for Jefferson County. [Repealed.]

24.180.
Jefferson County Circuit Court — Continuous session — Branches and divisions. [Repealed.]

24.190.
Election of judges — Separate votes. [Repealed.]

24.200.
Each judge to preside in division — Vacancies. [Repealed.]

24.210.
Court to make rules governing assignment of civil actions — Criminal prosecutions — Proceedings on bail bonds and recognizances.
[Repealed]

24.220.
Transfer of cases involving common fund. [Repealed.]

24.230.
Proceeding valid in any branch. [Repealed.]

24.240.
Judge of one division may preside over another. [Repealed.]

24.250.
Rules — General term — Order book. [Repealed.]

24.260.
Action on bond of court officers. [Repealed.]

24.265.
Bailiff — Appointment — Compensation. [Repealed.]

24.270.
Clerical assistants for judges of chancery branch. [Repealed.]